Louisiana, session 2026, SB286.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 33:2740.3(A) and 2740.3(A)(2),
(C)(1), (F), and (H) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 33:2740.3(G)(5) is hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§2740.3. The Downtown Development District of the City of New Orleans; creation,
composition, and powers; preparation of plans; levy of ad valorem
taxes and issuance of bonds
A.(1) There shall be, and there hereby is, created a special taxing district,
which shall be a political subdivision, within the city of New Orleans comprised
of all the territory within the following prescribed boundaries:
* * *
(2) The special taxing district shall be a political subdivision of the state
known as and is hereby designated the Downtown Development District of the City
of New Orleans, hereinafter in this Section referred to as the "district", the creation
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 286 ENROLLED
to be effective January 1, 1975.
* * *
C.(1) The board shall be composed of eleven members, at least five of whom
shall be qualified voters of the city of New Orleans, and shall have their principal
place of business in, or own property in, the district. Each board member shall be
subject to confirmation by the New Orleans city council.
(a) The members of the board shall possess additional qualifications and shall
be appointed as follows:
(i) Two of the members shall be appointed by the mayor of the city of New
Orleans.
(ii) One of the members shall be appointed by the New Orleans city council
member representing City Council District B of the New Orleans city council.
(iii) One of the members shall be appointed by New Orleans & Company.
(iv) Two of the members shall be appointed by the New Orleans Chamber of
Commerce, subject to approval by the president of the New Orleans city council.
(v) One of the members shall be appointed by the Greater New Orleans Hotel
and Lodging Association, subject to approval by the president of the New Orleans
city council.
(vi) One of the members shall be appointed by the Louisiana Restaurant
Association, subject to approval by the president of the New Orleans city council.
(vii) One of the members shall be appointed by the member or members of
the Louisiana House of Representatives who represent representing the district.
(viii) Two of the members shall be appointed by the member or members of
the Louisiana Senate who represent representing the district.
(b) Upon the first meeting, the members of the board shall be randomly
allotted terms as follows: three members for one year each, three members for two
years each, three members for three years each, and two members for four years
each; the length of the term for each individual appointed to be determined by lot.
They shall serve until their successors have been appointed and qualified. Each board
member shall be required to annually provide an affidavit attesting that the board
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 286 ENROLLED
member has a principal place of business or owns property in the district. Using the
initial staggered terms of each appointed member as established by the district
in September 2025, any newly appointed or reappointed board member shall
serve a term of five years, provided that if at the expiration of any term of office
of any board member a successor thereto has not been elected, then the member
whose term of office has expired shall continue to hold office until the successor
shall be appointed.
(c) The members of the board thereafter appointed by the mayor upon the
expiration of the respective terms of the initial appointees shall be selected and
appointed in accordance with the procedures in this Subsection prescribed for the
selection and appointment of the original members for the term of five years.
However, vacancies shall be filled from nominations submitted by the New Orleans
Chamber of Commerce in the following manner. The mayor shall select and appoint
one of two names submitted to him by such council for each of the five vacancies for
which the council is to submit nominees. If the selection and appointment by the
mayor does not take place within thirty days following submission of the nominees
by the New Orleans Chamber of Commerce, the selection and appointment shall be
made by the city council. Any vacancy which occurs prior to the expiration of the
term for which a member of the board has been appointed shall be filled in
accordance with the procedures as set forth herein. However, the New Orleans
Chamber of Commerce may submit additional nominees to either the mayor or the
city council, as applicable, until all vacancies pursuant to this Subsection are filled.
* * *
F. The city council, in addition to all other taxes which it is now or hereafter
may be authorized by law to levy and collect, is hereby authorized to levy and collect
as hereinafter specifically provided for a term not to exceed fifty years from and after
the date that the first tax is levied pursuant to the provisions of this Section, in the
same manner and at the same time as all other ad valorem taxes on property subject
to taxation by the city are levied and collected, a special ad valorem tax upon all
taxable real property situated within the boundaries of the core area development
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 286 ENROLLED
district. The number of mills hereby authorized shall be computed by dividing the
number of mills levied and collected by the city of New Orleans for general
operating purposes for the year 1977 into the number of mills levied and collected
by the city of New Orleans for general operating purposes for the year 1978 and
multiplying the result by ten. No such tax shall be levied until a plan requiring or
requesting the levy of a tax is finally and conclusively adopted in accordance with
the procedures prescribed in this Section. The proceeds of the tax shall be used solely
and exclusively for the purposes and benefit of the district. The Beginning with
revenues of such tax for the year 2027, and thereafter, the proceeds of the tax
shall be paid over to the Board of Liquidation, City Debt, district day by day as the
same are collected and received by the appropriate officials of the city of New
Orleans and maintained by the district in a separate account. The tax proceeds shall
be paid out by the Board of Liquidation, City Debt, solely for the purposes herein
provided upon warrants or drafts drawn on the Board of Liquidation, City Debt, by
the appropriate officials of the city and the treasurer of the district.
G.(1) * * *
(5) In the event that bonds payable from the special tax authorized,
levied, and collected pursuant to the provisions of this Section have been issued,
the district shall transfer to the Board of Liquidation, City Debt, from the first
revenues of such tax received in any calendar year, a sum equal to the principal
and interest payable on the bonds in that calendar year. After such amount of
the revenues of the tax have actually been transferred to the Board of
Liquidation, City Debt, then all revenues of the tax remaining in that year shall
be retained by the district and free for expenditure by the district for the
purposes for which the tax was authorized by the voters.
H. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section to the contrary, no tax
authorized in this Section shall be levied and no bonds shall be issued unless and
until the maximum amount of the tax and the maximum amount of the bonds has
been approved by a majority of the electors of the district voting thereon in the city
of New Orleans in an election called for that purpose. No bonds issued pursuant to
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 286 ENROLLED
this Section shall be general obligations of the state of Louisiana, the parish of
Orleans, or the city of New Orleans.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.